Maryland, session 2026, HB0408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
13–1002.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(B) IF THE COUNTY ENACTS A LOCAL LAW THAT REQUIRES A RETAIL
ESTABLISHMENT TO CHARGE AT THE POINT OF SALE A FEE FOR PROVIDING A
SINGLE–USE OR REUSABLE CARRYOUT BAG TO A CUSTOMER, THE COUNTY MAY
RETAIN, BY LOCAL LAW, A PORTION OF THE FEE CHARGED IN AN AMOUNT NOT
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0408*

HOUSE BILL 408
EXCEEDING 10 CENTS FOR EACH BAG.
(C) ANY FEES RETAINED BY THE COUNTY UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
PAID TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE COUNTY.
(D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PRECLUDE THE COUNTY FROM ALLOWING A
RETAILER TO RETAIN A PORTION OF THE FEES CHARGED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
LOCAL LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.